District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.13

Meetings and notice.

(a)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a board of directors may establish a time, date, and place for regular board meetings, and notice of the time, date, place, or purpose of those meetings shall not be required.

(b)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, notice of the time, date, and place of a special meeting of a board of directors shall be given to all directors at least 3 days before the meeting, the notice shall contain a statement of the purpose of the meeting, and the meeting shall be limited to the matters contained in the statement.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09 and § 29-1008.14.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 813 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition